Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2323
Appeal of sentence by prosecutor; sentencing alternatives.

Upon consideration of the criteria enumerated in section 29-2322, the appellate court shall:

(1) If it determines that the sentence imposed is excessively lenient, set aside the sentence, and:

(a) Remand the case for imposition of a greater sentence;

(b) Remand the case for further sentencing proceedings; or

(c) Impose a greater sentence; or

(2) If it determines that the sentence imposed is not excessively lenient, affirm the sentence.

Laws 1982, LB 402, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 85.

The Supreme Court has sentencing alternatives upon appeal of a sentence by a prosecutor. State v. Dobbins, 221 Neb. 778, 380 N.W.2d 640 (1986).

In a driving under the influence case, the appellate court found the sentence imposed by the trial court to be excessive, and, under this section, vacated the sentence and remanded the cause to the trial court for imposition of a greater sentence. State v. Hatt, 16 Neb. App. 397, 744 N.W.2d 493 (2008).